Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.72.272.
Pharmaceutical agents.

A licensee may prescribe and use a pharmaceutical agent, including a controlled substance, in the practice of optometry if the pharmaceutical agent is used in a manner consistent with standards adopted by the board in regulation. The standards must include limitations on practice adopted under AS

08.72.278

.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 27 SLA 2010.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 27 SLA 2010.]

In this section, “controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 49 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 1992; am §§ 9, 10 ch 24 SLA 2006; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 66 SLA 2007; am §§ 6, 7 ch 27 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 17 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Under § 7(b),
ch. 66, SLA 2007, the 2007 changes made to former (a) and to (c) of this section and the 2007 addition of (d) of this section by §§ 3, 5, and 6,
ch. 66, SLA 2007, “do not affect the scope of practice allowed under a license endorsement issued under
AS 08.72.175(a) before December 6, 2007.”

For a provision authorizing a licensee holding a license issued before June 2, 2010, who has a license endorsement issued under former subsection (c) to obtain a restricted license, authorizing the board to issue restricted licenses to certain optometrists as permitted under former subsection (c) and to continue to renew those licenses, subject to exceptions, see § 8(c) — (e), ch. 27, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 24, SLA 2006, makes the 2006 amendment of (b) of this section and the enactment of (c) of this section retroactive to July 1, 1992.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 24, 2017, in (d), substituted “during the preceding licensing period” for “in the four years preceding the application for renewal” following “board evidence that,” deleted the (d)(1) — (3) designations, and deleted (d)(1) and (2) relating to completion of required hours of continuing education on certain topics, and deleted “other” preceding “continuing education requirements” near the end.

Sec. 08.72.273.
Removal of foreign bodies.

A licensee may remove superficial foreign bodies from the eye and its appendages. This section is not intended to permit a licensee to perform invasive surgery.

History.

(§ 3 ch 58 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.72.274.
Exemption.

Except for AS

08.72.275

, this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter do not limit the practice of an optician licensed under AS 08.71.

History.

(§ 7 ch 49 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.72.275.
Lenses and frames for eyeglasses and sunglasses.

A person may not fabricate, distribute, sell, exchange, deliver or possess with intent to distribute, sell, exchange or deliver eyeglasses or sunglasses unless they are fitted with plastic lenses, laminated lenses, heat-treated glass lenses, or glass lenses made impact resistant by other methods. All plastic and heat-treated glass lenses, before they are mounted in frames, shall be capable of withstanding the impact of a five-eighths inch steel ball dropped on the lens from a height of 50 inches. The impact test shall be conducted at room temperature, with the lens supported by a plastic tube one inch inside diameter, one and one-fourth inch outside diameter, with a one-eighth inch by one-eighth inch neoprene gasket on the top edge.

A person may not fabricate, distribute, sell, exchange, deliver or possess with intent to distribute, sell, exchange or deliver eyeglasses or sunglasses having frames manufactured from cellulose nitrate or other highly flammable materials.

A licensee may sell, exchange, or deliver eyeglasses or sunglasses that do not meet the requirements of (a) of this section if the sale, exchange, or delivery is authorized in a written request signed by the patient.

A person who violates this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $100.

History.

(§ 1 ch 220 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1973; am § 20 ch 75 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was formerly (d), and subsection (d) was formerly (c). Relettered in 1991.

Sec. 08.72.276.
Maximum dosage for opioid prescriptions.

A licensee may not issue

an initial prescription for an opioid that exceeds a four-day supply to an adult patient for outpatient use;

a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a four-day supply to a minor; upon issuance of a prescription for an opioid to a minor, the licensee shall discuss with the parent or guardian of the minor why the prescription is necessary and the risks associated with opioid use.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensee may issue a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a four-day supply to an adult or minor patient if the licensee determines that more than a four-day supply of an opioid is necessary

to treat the patient’s medical condition or for chronic pain management; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient’s medical condition or chronic pain; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the condition triggering the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a four-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; or

for a patient who is unable to access a practitioner within the time necessary for a refill of the four-day supply because of a logistical or travel barrier; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient for the time that the patient is unable to access a practitioner; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a four-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; in this paragraph, “practitioner” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

History.

(§ 28 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 50, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 makes this section effective October 24, 2017.

Sec. 08.72.278.
Limitation on practice.

A licensee may perform the services of optometry as defined in AS

08.72.300

only if the services are within the scope of the licensee’s education, training, and experience as established by regulations adopted by the board.

A licensee may not perform ophthalmic surgery unless the procedure is

within the scope of the licensee’s education and training from an accredited school of optometry; and

authorized by regulations adopted by the board.

In this section, “ophthalmic surgery” means an invasive procedure in which human tissue is cut, ablated, or otherwise penetrated by incision, laser, or other means to treat diseases of the human eye, alter or correct refractive error, or alter or enhance cosmetic appearance; “ophthalmic surgery” does not include the procedure described under AS

08.72.273

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 17 SLA 2017)

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 17, SLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect October 24, 2017.

Sec. 08.72.280.
Prohibited acts.

A person may not falsely personate a licensed optometrist, or buy, sell, or fraudulently obtain a license issued to another or advertise the practice of optometry in violation of regulations of the board.
Practicing or offering to practice optometry without a license is sufficient evidence of a violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 35-3-144 ACLA 1949; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 1988)

Sec. 08.72.290.
Criminal penalty.

A person who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment for a term of not less than 10 days nor more than 90 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 35-3-145 ACLA 1949)